Connecticut, session 2026, HB05427.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10a-174 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Award" means the greater of: (A) The unpaid portion, if any, of a
qualifying student's eligible institutional costs after subtracting his or
her financial aid, or (B) a minimum award of five hundred dollars for a
full-time student or three hundred dollars for a part-time student;
(2) "Eligible institutional costs" means the tuition and required fees
incurred each semester by an individual student that are established by
the Board of Regents for Higher Education for the Connecticut State
Community College;
LCO 2036 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5427
(3) "Financial aid" means the sum of all scholarships, grants and
federal, state and institutional aid received by a qualifying student.
"Financial aid" does not include any federal, state or private student
loans received by a qualifying student;
(4) "Qualifying student" means any person who (A) graduated from
a public or nonpublic high school, (B) enrolls as a full-time or part-time
student at the Connecticut State Community College (i) for the fall
semester of 2020, or any semester thereafter, [at the Connecticut State
Community College] in a program leading to a degree or certificate, or
(ii) for the fall semester of 2026, or any semester thereafter, in a
workforce development or continuing education program, (C) is
classified as an in-state student pursuant to section 10a-29, (D) is making
satisfactory academic progress while enrolled at the Connecticut State
Community College, (E) has completed the Free Application for Federal
Student Aid, and (F) has accepted all available financial aid or is a
transition program student;
(5) "Full-time student" means a student who is enrolled at the
Connecticut State Community College and (A) is carrying twelve or
more credit hours in a semester, or (B) has a learning disability
documented with the Connecticut State Community College [in which
he or she is enrolled] and is enrolled in the maximum number of credit
hours that is feasible for such student to attempt in a semester, as
determined by such student's academic advisor;
(6) "Semester" means the fall or spring semester of an academic year.
"Semester" does not include a summer semester or session;
(7) "Part-time student" means a student who is enrolled at the
Connecticut State Community College and is carrying not less than six
but fewer than twelve credit hours in a semester; and
(8) "Transition program student" means any person who (A) is a
resident of this state, (B) has not graduated from high school, (C) is
enrolled in a transition program pursuant to such person's
individualized education program, and (D) enrolls in one or more
LCO 2036 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5427
courses at the Connecticut State Community College.
(b) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall (1) establish a
debt-free community college program to make awards to qualifying
students each semester, (2) adopt rules, procedures and forms necessary
to implement the debt-free community college program, and (3) submit
a report outlining such rules, procedures and forms, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher
education. Awards made to qualifying students pursuant to the debt-
free community college program shall be designated as the "Mary Ann
Handley Award".
(c) For the fall semester of 2020, and each semester thereafter, the
Board of Regents for Higher Education shall make awards to qualifying
students within available appropriations. An award shall be available
to a qualifying student for the first seventy-two credit hours earned by
the qualifying student, or for noncredit programs, for the first six
semesters the qualifying student enrolls in such programs at the
Connecticut State Community College, provided the qualifying student
meets and continues to meet the requirements of this section. The board
shall not use an award to supplant any financial aid, including, but not
limited to, state or institutional aid, otherwise available to a qualifying
student.
(d) Not later than November 1, 2024, and March 1, 2025, and each
semester thereafter, the Board of Regents for Higher Education shall
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to higher education and employment advancement and
appropriations and the budgets of the state agencies regarding the debt-
free community college program, including, but not limited to, (1) the
number of qualifying students enrolled at the Connecticut State
Community College during each semester, (2) the number of qualifying
students receiving minimum awards and the number of qualifying
students receiving awards for the unpaid portion of eligible institutional
LCO 2036 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5427
costs, (3) the average number of credit hours the qualifying students
enrolled in each semester and the average number of credit hours the
qualifying students completed each semester, (4) the average amount of
the award made to qualifying students under this section for the unpaid
portion of eligible institutional costs, and (5) the completion rates of
qualifying students receiving awards under this section by degree, [or]
certificate, workforce development program or continuing education
program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10a-174
HED Joint Favorable C/R APP
LCO 2036 4 of 4